District of Columbia statutes.
8-1721

Soil and Water Conservation District — Reestablished.

The Soil and Water Conservation District established by § 8-1703 is reestablished as a District of Columbia government agency.

Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-39, § 2, 34 DCR 5331
This section is referenced in § 8-1704.
1981 Ed., § 1-2803.1.
Section 15 of D.C. Law 4-143 provided that the Soil and Water Conservation District, established by § 8-1703, shall terminate on January 1, 1987, unless it is subsequently reestablished by an act of the Council of the District of Columbia. Section 8-1721, reestablishing the Soil and Water Conservation District, was enacted July 25, 1987.